District of Columbia statutes.
29-804.02

Form of contribution.

A contribution may consist of property transferred, services performed, or another benefit provided to the limited liability company or an agreement to transfer property, perform services, or provide another benefit to the company.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(h)(5)(B), 59 DCR 13171
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 rewrote the section.

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 402 of the Uniform Limited Company Act (2006 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.